Florida, session 2026, HB509.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 162.41, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
162.41 Code inspector body cameras; policies and
procedures.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Body camera" means a portable electronic recording
device worn on a code inspector's person which records audio and
video data of the code inspector's encounters and activities.
(b) "Code inspector" has the same meaning as in s.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb509-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 509 2026
162.04(2).
(2) A governmental entity that permits its code inspectors
to wear body cameras shall establish policies and procedures
addressing the proper use, maintenance, and storage of body
cameras and the data recorded by body cameras. The policies and
procedures must include all of the following:
(a) General guidelines for the proper use, maintenance,
and storage of body cameras.
(b) Any limitation on which code inspectors are permitted
to wear body cameras.
(c) Any limitation on code enforcement-related encounters
and activities in which code inspectors are permitted to wear
body cameras. A code inspector must be permitted to use a body
camera to record any encounter with a member of the public which
occurs while the inspector is performing his or her duties.
(d) General guidelines for the proper storage, retention,
and release of audio and video data recorded by body cameras.
(3) A governmental entity that permits its code inspectors
to wear body cameras shall do all of the following:
(a) Ensure that all personnel who wear, use, maintain, or
store body cameras are trained in the governmental entity's body
camera policies and procedures.
(b) Ensure that all personnel who use, maintain, store, or
release audio or video data recorded by body cameras are trained
in the governmental entity's policies and procedures.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb509-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 509 2026
(c) Retain audio and video data recorded by body cameras
in accordance with the requirements of s. 119.021, except as
otherwise provided by law.
(d) Perform a periodic review of actual body camera
practices to ensure conformity with the governmental entity's
body camera policies and procedures.
(4) Chapter 934 does not apply to body camera recordings
made by code inspectors who elect to use body cameras.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb509-01-c1